Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3308
Professional or occupational license, defined.

Professional or occupational license means a license, certificate, registration, permit, or other similar document evidencing admission to or granting authority to engage in a profession or occupation in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 8.